Hawaii statutes.
§246-33 Property used in manufacture of
pulp and paper. All property in the State, both real and personal,
actually and solely used or to be used, whether by the owner or lessee thereof,
in connection with the manufacture of pulp and paper from bagasse fibre, shall
be exempt from property taxes for a period of five years from the first day of
January following commencement of construction of a plant or plants on the
property for such purpose. [L 1955, c 220, §2; RL 1955, §128-20.3; HRS §246-33;
am L 1969, c 170, §14; am L 1975, c 157, §13]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next